SpellChecking/SpellCheckingTests/bin/Debug/Dictionaries/chuvash.aff
SFX B Y 863
SFX B 0 сем/P .
SFX B 0 /RT .
SFX B 0 ĕн/RT [^еĕӳэи]
SFX B ь ĕн/RT ь
SFX B ӳ ĕвĕн/RT ӳ
SFX B 0 н/RT е
SFX B 0 е/RT [^еĕӳэи]
SFX B ь е/RT ь
SFX B ӳ ĕве/RT ӳ
SFX B 0 не/RT е
SFX B 0 не/RT и
SFX B 0 ре/RT [^аоьлнр]
SFX B 0 ре/RT [^лнр]ь
SFX B 0 те/RT [лнр]ь
SFX B 0 те/RT [лнр]
SFX B 0 ти/RT [лнр]
SFX B 0 ри/RT [^лнр]
SFX B 0 рен/RT [^аоьлнр]
SFX B 0 рен/RT [^лнр]ь
SFX B 0 тен/RT [лнр]ь
SFX B 0 тен/RT [лнр]
SFX B 0 пе/RT [^ь]
SFX B 0 пе/RT ь
SFX B 0 сĕр/RT [^ь]
SFX B 0 сĕр/RT ь
SFX B 0 шĕн/RT [^ь]
SFX B 0 шĕн/RT ь
SFX B 0 ĕм/RT [^еĕиӳ]
SFX B 0 ĕмсем/P [^еĕиӳ]
SFX B 0 ĕмĕр/RT [^еĕиӳ]
SFX B 0 ĕмĕрсем/P [^еĕиӳ]
SFX B 0 м/RT е
SFX B 0 мĕр/RT е
SFX B 0 мсем/P е
SFX B 0 мĕрсем/P е
SFX B ӳ ĕвĕм/RT ӳ
SFX B ӳ ĕвĕмĕр/RT ӳ
SFX B ӳ ĕвĕмсем/P ӳ
SFX B ӳ ĕвĕмĕрсем/P ӳ
SFX B ĕ вĕм/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кĕм/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ лĕм/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ мĕм/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нĕм/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пĕм/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ рĕм/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ сĕм/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çĕм/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тĕм/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хĕм/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чĕм/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шĕм/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B ĕ вĕмĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кĕмĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ лĕмĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ мĕмĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нĕмĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пĕмĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ рĕмĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ сĕмĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çĕмĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тĕмĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хĕмĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чĕмĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шĕмĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B ĕ вĕмсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кĕмсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ лĕмсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ мĕмсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нĕмсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пĕмсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ рĕмсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ сĕмсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çĕмсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тĕмсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хĕмсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чĕмсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шĕмсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B ĕ вĕмĕрсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кĕмĕрсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ лĕмĕрсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ мĕмĕрсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нĕмĕрсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пĕмĕрсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ рĕмĕрсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ сĕмĕрсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çĕмĕрсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тĕмĕрсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хĕмĕрсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чĕмĕрсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шĕмĕрсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B 0 м/RT [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 мĕр/RT [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 мсем/P [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 мĕрсем/P [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 йĕм/RT и
SFX B 0 йĕмсем/P и
SFX B 0 йĕмĕр/RT и
SFX B 0 йĕмĕрсем/P и
SFX B 0 ӳ/RT [^еĕиӳ]
SFX B 0 ĕр/RT [^еĕиӳ]
SFX B 0 ӳсем/P [^еĕиӳ]
SFX B 0 ĕрсем/P [^еĕиӳ]
SFX B е ӳ/RT е
SFX B е ĕр/RT е
SFX B е ӳсем/P е
SFX B е ĕрсем/P е
SFX B ӳ ĕвӳ/RT ӳ
SFX B ӳ ĕвĕр/RT ӳ
SFX B ӳ ĕвӳсем/P ӳ
SFX B ӳ ĕвĕрсем/P ӳ
SFX B ĕ вӳ/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кӳ/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ лӳ/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ мӳ/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нӳ/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пӳ/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ рӳ/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ сӳ/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çӳ/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тӳ/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хӳ/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чӳ/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шӳ/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B ĕ вĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ лĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ мĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ рĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ сĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B ĕ вӳсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кӳсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ лӳсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ мӳсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нӳсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пӳсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ рӳсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ сӳсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çӳсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тӳсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хӳсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чӳсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шӳсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B ĕ вĕрсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кĕрсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ лĕрсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ мĕрсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нĕрсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пĕрсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ рĕрсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ сĕрсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çĕрсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тĕрсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хĕрсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чĕрсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шĕрсем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B ĕ ӳ/RT [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 р/RT [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B ĕ ӳсем/P [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 рсем/P [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 йӳ/RT и
SFX B 0 йӳсем/P и
SFX B 0 йĕр/RT и
SFX B 0 йĕрсем/P и
SFX B 0 ĕ/RT [^еĕиӳт]
SFX B т чĕ/RT т
SFX B 0 ĕсем/P [^еĕиӳт]
SFX B т чĕсем/P т
SFX B е и/RT е
SFX B е исем/P е
SFX B ӳ ĕвĕ/RT ӳ
SFX B ӳ ĕвĕсем/P ӳ
SFX B ĕ ви/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ ки/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ ли/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ ми/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ ни/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пи/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ ри/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ си/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çи/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ ти/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хи/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чи/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ ши/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B ĕ висем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кисем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ лисем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ мисем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нисем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ писем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ рисем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ сисем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çисем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тисем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хисем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чисем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шисем/P [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B ĕ и/RT [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B ĕ исем/P [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 йĕ/RT и
SFX B 0 йĕсем/P и
SFX B 0 ĕмĕн/RT [^еĕиӳ]
SFX B 0 ĕмĕрĕн/RT [^еĕиӳ]
SFX B 0 мĕн/RT е
SFX B 0 мĕрĕн/RT е
SFX B ӳ ĕвĕмĕн/RT ӳ
SFX B ӳ ĕвĕмĕрĕн/RT ӳ
SFX B ĕ вĕмĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кĕмĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ лĕмĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ мĕмĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нĕмĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пĕмĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ рĕмĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ сĕмĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çĕмĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тĕмĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хĕмĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чĕмĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шĕмĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B ĕ вĕмĕрĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кĕмĕрĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ лĕмĕрĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ мĕмĕрĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нĕмĕрĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пĕмĕрĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ рĕмĕрĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ сĕмĕрĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çĕмĕрĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тĕмĕрĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хĕмĕрĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чĕмĕрĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шĕмĕрĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B 0 мĕн/RT [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 мĕрĕн/RT [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 йĕмĕн/RT и
SFX B 0 йĕмĕрĕн/RT и
SFX B 0 ӳн/RT [^еĕиӳ]
SFX B 0 ĕрĕн/RT [^еĕиӳ]
SFX B е ӳн/RT е
SFX B е ĕрĕн/RT е
SFX B ӳ ĕвӳн/RT ӳ
SFX B ӳ ĕвĕрĕн/RT ӳ
SFX B ĕ вӳн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кӳн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ лӳн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ мӳн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нӳн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пӳн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ рӳн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ сӳн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çӳн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тӳн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хӳн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чӳн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шӳн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B ĕ вĕрĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кĕрĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ лĕрĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ мĕрĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нĕрĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пĕрĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ рĕрĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ сĕрĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çĕрĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тĕрĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хĕрĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чĕрĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
