SpellChecking/SpellCheckingTests/bin/Debug/Dictionaries/chuvash.dic
Çӳçмет/B
çĕнтерӳ/B
çемье/B
çукки/B
çӳрекен/B
ĕçкĕ/B
ĕçлекен/B
ĕлке/B
ĕмĕтленни/B
ĕнĕçсĕр/B
ĕнентерӳлĕх/B
ĕнерсĕр/FB
ĕревшĕ/B
ĕрехет/B
ĕсĕклев/B
ĕшне/B
Авдей/B
Аканьия/B
Алиçке/B
Алями/B
Аппике/B
Ассири/B
Ахмит/B
Бельги/B
Бразили/B
Ваçинке/B
Варпинес/B
Венгри/B
Вирджини/B
Гордей/B
Димитрий/B
Евсей/B
Елей/B
Енеспи/B
Ентирек/B
Ернеç/B
Ешмен/B
Замби/B
Игнатий/B
Илетпи/B
Илмет/B
Илтер/B
Ильмень/B
Иннокентий/B
Исевли/B
Исментĕр/B
Ишетер/B
Йӳккел/B
Кĕлшевер/B
Кĕнешер/B
Калик/B
Кампет/B
Катĕрмей/B
Кемĕлпи/B
Клейсор/B
Конфуций/B
Латви/B
Лодзь/B
Мăши/B
Мавритани/B
Манапике/B
Маркки/B
Матйер/B
Мемеккей/B
Мерти/B
Мики/B
Минепи/B
Минтукĕл/B
Миччи/B
Монреаль/B
Мультийер/B
Непселим/B
Норманди/B
Пăрханттин/B
Пайми/B
Патийер/B
Пахтийер/B
Пик/B
Пиккине/B
Пинеççе/B
Пинесен/B
Пинке/B
Питмет/B
Пномпень/B
Претори/B
Припять/B
Путене/B
Родези/B
Сĕвенттей/B
Сĕля/B
Саватке/B
Савкĕлти/B
Савнепи/B
Саврентей/B
Сайрепи/B
Сапиле/B
Сармантей/B
Сатри/B
Сахмантей/B
Северпи/B
Сенетпи/B
Сентти/B
Серенке/B
Серпинеш/B
Сетнер/B
Силевер/B
Силмен/B
Силхевер/B
Симушки/B
Синтимĕр/B
Ситимĕр/B
Словени/B
Суздаль/B
Тăхти/B
Тайрепи/B
Тарйе/B
Тевеччей/B
Темин/B
Теччĕ/B
Тимми/B
Тойтерек/B
Туймек/B
Тукĕли/B
Турци/B
Тушкилт/B
Укантей/B
Ультепи/B
Унетпи/B
Утеней/B
Ухатер/B
Ухтирек/B
Хăвантей/B
Хĕрпийе/B
Хаççипе/B
Хампике/B
Хилиме/B
Хуньтир/B
Чехословаки/B
Шеверпи/B
Шенерпи/B
Шерип/B
Шерпикке/B
Шотланди/B
Элентей/B
Элле/B
Элтирек/B
Эппинек/B
Эптӳç/B
Эрхентей/B
Этик/B
Эшкер/B
Ярахви/B
абстракцилĕх/B
авиастроени/B
автономи/B
агрессилĕх/B
администраци/B
акселераци/B
аллегори/B
амаçури/B
амутке/B
анестези/B
анталоги/B
апологи/B
аптăри/B
армути/B
асатте/B
асси/B
атвит/B
аудитори/B
бактеризаци/B
библиотекарь/B
боржоми/B
бурки/B
вăшăлти/B
вĕçкĕнчĕк/B
вĕçтерекен/B
вĕрен/GB
вĕренӳлĕх/B
вĕршен/B
вĕтеленчĕк/B
вĕтӳ/B
вакцинаци/B
варвитти/B
венерологи/B
верпăнни/B
вещани/B
виçкĕлчĕ/B
вилĕм/B
вир/B
виски/B
витĕнчĕк/B
витре/B
воспитани/B
вуткасси/B
газификаци/B
гармонизаци/B
генилĕх/B
гидробиологи/B
гимнази/B
гносеологи/B
граци/B
дегенераци/B
дезорганизаци/B
декораци/B
демографи/B
дериваци/B
диагональ/B
дипломати/B
диспетчеризаци/B
дифференциаци/B
донесени/B
дюралюмини/B
евчĕ/B
елчĕк/B
енчĕк/B
еркĕн/B
еткерлĕх/B
жалюзи/B
задани/B
заявлени/B
иваси/B
иждивени/B
изобретени/B
иккĕленни/B
илĕртӳлĕх/B
иленчĕк/B
им/B
иммиграци/B
инаугураци/B
индологи/B
инкек/B
интенсификаци/B
интродукци/B
ионизаци/B
ирĕклĕх/B
ирсĕр/B
искусствоведени/B
ихĕлти/B
йăкăрти/B
йĕвен/B
йĕке/B
йĕксĕклĕх/B
йĕмлĕх/B
йĕплĕхен/B
йĕрĕнтермĕш/FB
йĕркеленӳ/B
йĕсмеле/B
йывăрăш/B
йӳлер/B
кăмăл/AB
кĕвĕсĕрлĕх/B
кĕлет/B
кĕнтелем/B
кĕрĕклĕх/B
кĕрешĕн/B
кĕрпе/B
кĕсре/B
кĕтӳех/B
кадми/B
калтенек/B
канитель/B
кардиографи/B
категори/B
кефаль/B
килĕштерӳ/B
кинемей/B
кире/B
китаеведени/B
князь/B
командующи/B
комсомольски/B
конструкци/B
концесси/B
космологи/B
крушени/B
кури/B
кӳлĕ/B
кӳпчеме/B
лĕкĕрти/B
лапăрти/B
лекнĕскер/B
литературоведени/B
лӳчĕркенчĕк/B
мĕлке/B
магноли/B
мафи/B
мелке/B
мерчен/B
мечĕк/B
милке/B
михĕлĕх/B
морфи/B
мучей/B
напряжени/B
непĕссĕрлĕх/B
номинаци/B
обструкци/B
оратори/B
пăртуççи/B
пĕлĕмçĕ/B
пĕрĕм/B
пĕрлештерӳ/B
пĕсехе/B
пĕчченçи/B
парламентари/B
пашлик/B
перигей/B
пиçĕм/B
пилеш/B
пит/B
плантаци/B
полномочи/B
праçник/B
природоведени/B
професси/B
пуленкке/B
пускил/B
пӳлĕм/B
пӳртем/B
радионавигаци/B
реакци/B
резекци/B
рентгенотерапи/B
решени/B
сĕлхе/B
сĕртĕнӳ/B
самолётостроени/B
сейсмологи/B
сеппер/B
сивлеклĕх/B
сиктерчĕк/B
синкек/B
сисĕмсĕрлĕх/B
соглашателлĕх/B
стабилизаци/B
стилизаци/B
суеçĕ/B
сыппи/B
сӳретке/B
тĕве/B
тĕллев/B
тĕнккес/B
тĕрçĕ/B
тĕрен/B
тĕршĕнчĕк/B
таксаци/B
телевидени/B
теологи/B
тетте/B
тикенек/B
типири/B
тирек/B
топографи/B
трепанаци/B
тӳлев/B
тӳрĕлĕх/B
тӳтрешке/B
унци/B
утопи/B
фекали/B
флотили/B
хăйçӳрен/B
хĕлхем/B
хĕреснатте/B
хĕсĕрлевçĕ/B
хатĕрлевçĕ/B
хирĕçӳлĕх/B
хресчен/B
хӳтĕлев/B
чăйăлти/B
чĕлĕм/B
чĕмере/B
чĕренче/B
чĕрт/B
чемчем/B
чесанки/B
чикен/B
чӳлĕк/B
шĕвĕркке/B
шасси/B
шерепе/B
шиксĕрлĕх/B
шӳкĕр/B
экологи/B
элек/B
элчĕ/B
энерги/B
эрешмен/B
эссенци/B
юриспруденци/B
ӳкерӳ/B
ӳретте/B
ӳсленкĕ/B
